Utah statutes.
13-49-201.   Requirement to be registered as an immigration consultant -- Exemptions.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a person may not engage in an activity of an immigration consultant for compensation unless the person is registered under this chapter.

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to a person authorized:

(i)  to practice law in this state; or

(ii)  by federal law to represent persons before the Board of Immigration Appeals or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(2)  An immigration consultant may only offer nonlegal assistance or advice in an immigration matter.

